North Carolina, session 2025, SB781.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Part 2 of Article 4 of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 105-153.13. Tax credit for businesses that provide wages for employee health insurance
premiums.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Eligible business. – A business with a physical presence in the State that has
eligible expenses.
(2) Eligible expenses. – Wages paid by an eligible business to a qualifying
employee for the payment of an employee's health insurance premiums.
(3) Qualifying employee. – An individual employed (i) for consideration for at
least 35 hours a week and whose wages are subject to withholding under
Article 4A of this Chapter and (ii) by an eligible business.
(b) Credit. – A taxpayer who is an eligible business is allowed a credit against the tax
imposed by this Part in an amount not to exceed four hundred dollars ($400.00) per qualifying
employee.
(c) Aggregate Limitation. – The total amount of credits allowed pursuant to this section
may not exceed in the aggregate five million dollars ($5,000,000) for all taxpayers for any one
calendar year.
(d) Application. – An eligible business seeking to claim a tax credit provided for under
this section shall submit an application to the Department of Revenue for tentative approval for
the tax credit in the year for which the tax credit is claimed or allowed. Applications shall be
accepted on a first-come, first-served basis. The Department of Revenue shall provide for the
manner in which the application is to be submitted and the information required in the application
which shall include, at a minimum, proof of the applicant business's eligible expenses. The
Department of Revenue shall review the application and tentatively shall approve the application
upon determining that it meets the requirements of this section by January 31 of the year after
the application was submitted. If the credit amounts on the tax credit applications filed with the
Department of Revenue exceed the maximum aggregate limit of tax credits, then the tax credit
must be allocated among the eligible business entities who filed a timely application on a
first-come, first-served basis based upon the amounts otherwise allowed by this section. Once
the tax credit application has been approved and the amount has been communicated to the
*S781-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
applicant, the eligible business then may apply the amount of the approved tax credit to its tax
liability for the tax year of which the approved application applies.
(e) Report. – By March 31 of each year, the Department of Revenue shall report to the
Joint Legislative Committee on Governmental Operations by county, the number of eligible
business tax credit applications the Department has received, the number of tax credit
applications approved, and the tax credits approved. This report must be made available in a
conspicuous place on the Department's website."
SECTION 2. This act is effective for taxable years beginning on or after January 1,
2026.
Page 2 Senate Bill 781-First Edition